Illinois, session 104th, HB632.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Reproductive Health Act is amended by 5changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (775 ILCS 55/1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Reproductive Health Act.9(Source: P.A. 101-13, eff. 6-12-19.)